Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 33.
EVIDENCE

Chapter

621 Evidence and Witnesses, Generally

621C Witness Immunity

622 Documentary Evidence

623 Uniform Judicial Notice of Foreign Laws--Repealed

624 Depositions and Discovery

624D Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery
Act

625 Notice to Admit, Inspection, and Discovery--Repealed

626 Hawaii Rules of Evidence

CHAPTER
621

EVIDENCE
AND WITNESSES, GENERALLY

Section

621-1 Subpoena, issue of

621-2, 3 Repealed

621-4 Compelling attendance

621-5 Bystanders called without subpoena

621-6 Repealed

621-7 Fees; criminal cases

621-8 Attendance roll; parking violations
exemption

621-9 Witness and defendant expenses; budgetary
procedure

621-10 Reporting daily

621-10.5 Unlawful suspension or discharge from
employment;

penalty; right of action

621-11 Repealed

621-12 Oath; affirmation

621-13 Oaths, validity of

621-14 to 25 Repealed

621-26 Confessions, when admissible

621-27 Repealed

621-28 Accompaniment of children at judicial
proceedings

621-30 Use of a facility dog

Cross References

Televised testimony of victims and witnesses, see §801D-7.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next